California, session 20252026, AB395.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 37224 is added to the Education Code, to read:37224. (a) Commencing with the 2026–27 school year, the governing board of a school district, a county office of education, or the governing body of a charter school shall consider making efforts to avoid scheduling the first day of class and high school graduation, if applicable, on a date for which the governing board of the school district, the county office of education, or the governing body of the charter school knows, or has reason to know, that members of the public would be unable to participate or be present due to the ritual observance of a religious, cultural, or ancestral holiday.(b) In considering and making a determination of which dates to avoid, the governing board of a school district, a county office of education, or the governing body of a charter school shall actively seek input from the affected community and consider any other relevant sources to ensure inclusive public participation.SEC. 2. Article 12 (commencing with Section 66095) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 12. Academic Calendar66095. (a) Commencing with the 2026–27 academic year, the governing board of a community college and the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, make every good faith, reasonable effort efforts when developing academic calendars to avoid calendaring an institutional event on a date for which the institution of higher education knows, or has reason to know, that members of the public would be unable to participate or be present due to the ritual observance of a religious, cultural, or ancestral holiday.(b) As used in this section, “institutional event” means an event on the academic or institutional calendar for which students are mandated to attend, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Student orientation.(2) Student housing move-in day.(3) Academic examination days.(4) The beginning or ending of an academic term.(5) Commencement ceremonies.(c) In considering and making a determination of which dates to avoid, the governing board of a community college and the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, seek input from the student and faculty organizations on campus prior to the calendaring of institutional events.(d) (1) A person who has suffered harm as a result of a violation of this section may bring a civil action. The sole remedy available in that action shall be injunctive relief.(2) To prevail in an action for injunctive relief brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the plaintiff shall demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the violation was due to bad faith, willful misconduct, or callous disregard on the part of the respondent.SEC. 3. Section 11131 of the Government Code is amended to read:11131. (a) As used in this section, “state agency” means and includes every state body, office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, council, commission, or other state agency.(b) A state agency shall not conduct any meeting, conference, or other function in any facility that prohibits the admittance of any person, or persons, on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135, that is inaccessible to disabled persons, or where members of the public may not be present without making a payment or purchase.(c) A state agency shall make every good faith, reasonable effort efforts to avoid conducting any meeting, conference, or other function on a date for which the state agency knows, or has reason to know, that members of the public would be unable to participate or be present due to the ritual observance of a religious, cultural, or ancestral holiday, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Eid al-Adha.(2) Eid al-Fitr.(3) Feast of the Nativity.(4) Maha Shivaratri.(5) The first and last two days of Pesach, also known as Passover.(6) Rosh Hashanah.(7) Yom Kippur.(8) Diwali.(9) Dussehra.(d) (1) A person who has suffered harm as a result of a violation of subdivision (c) may bring a civil action. The sole remedy available in that action shall be injunctive relief.(2) To prevail in an action for injunctive relief brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the plaintiff shall demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the violation was due to bad faith, willful misconduct, or callous disregard on the part of the respondent.SEC. 4. Section 54961 of the Government Code is amended to read:54961. (a) A legislative body of a local agency shall not conduct any meeting in any facility that prohibits the admittance of any person, or persons, on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135, that is inaccessible to disabled persons, or where members of the public may not be present without making a payment or purchase. This section applies to every local agency as defined in Section 54951.(b) A legislative body of a local agency is encouraged to consider making efforts to avoid conducting any meeting, conference, or other function on a date for which the legislative body knows, or has reason to know, that members of the public would be unable to participate or be present due to the ritual observance of a religious, cultural, or ancestral holiday, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Eid al-Adha.(2) Eid al-Fitr.(3) Feast of the Nativity.(4) Maha Shivaratri.(5) The first and last two days of Pesach, also known as Passover.(6) Rosh Hashanah.(7) Yom Kippur.(8) Diwali.(9) Dussehra.(c) No notice, agenda, announcement, or report required under this chapter need identify any victim or alleged victim of tortious sexual conduct or child abuse unless the identity of the person has been publicly disclosed.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 4 of this act, which amends Section 54961 of the Government Code, furthers, within the meaning of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the purposes of that constitutional section as it relates to the right of public access to the meetings of local public bodies or the writings of local public officials and local agencies. Pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the Legislature makes the following findings:By encouraging local agencies to avoid conducting any meeting, conference, or other function on a religious, cultural, or ancestral holiday, this act furthers the purpose of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, and promotes greater public access to the public meetings of local agencies.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.